Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB621.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 635 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If a child is adjudicated for a violation of KRS 508.075, 508.078, or 508.080:
(1) The court may in its discretion impose a fine against the parents of the child.
Notwithstanding KRS 635.085, the imposition of a fine pursuant to this section
shall be based upon a determination that law enforcement agencies incurred
excessive costs in responding to the offense; and
(2) Notwithstanding other provisions of KRS 635.060, the child shall be detained
pursuant to KRS 635.060(3).
Section 2. KRS 159.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever any child of compulsory school age seeks to withdraw[withdraws] from
a public, private, or parochial school, the school[teacher of the child] shall
ascertain the reason and the school to which the child seeks to transfer. The fact of
the withdrawal, [and ]the reason[ for it], and the identified transfer school shall be
immediately transmitted by the school[teacher] to the superintendent of schools of
the district in which the school is located. If the child seeks to withdraw[has
withdrawn] because of change of residence, the next residence shall be ascertained
and included in the report.
(2) If a child of compulsory school age who is alleged to be a habitual truant or to be
dependent, neglected, or abused seeks to withdraw from a public school to enroll
in an at-home private school, the transfer shall not be effective until the
proceedings for those allegations have concluded.
(3) The Kentucky Department of Education shall ensure that the student information
system facilitates the collection of student data and the transfer of education records
among schools and local districts.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/31/2025 4:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1329
(4)[(3)] A school district shall notify the Kentucky Department of Education when a
new student enrolls in a school in the district.
(5)[(4)] The Kentucky Department of Education, upon notification of a student's
enrollment in a school, shall forward within ten (10) working days all records
regarding the student collected under this section to the receiving district.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/31/2025 4:10 PM Jacketed